Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.290

Sewerage lien—Enforcement—Alternative method.

As an additional and concurrent method of enforcing the lien authorized in this chapter any city or town operating its own municipal water system may provide by ordinance for the enforcement of the lien by cutting off the water service from the premises to which such sewer service was furnished after the charges become delinquent and unpaid, until the charges are paid.

The right to enforce the lien by cutting off and refusing water service shall not be exercised after two years from the date of the recording of sewerage lien notice except to enforce payment of six months' charges for which no lien notice is required to be recorded.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.67.290. Prior: 1941 c 193 s 10; Rem. Supp. 1941 s 9354-13.]